Montana, session 2025, HB684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 75-5-702, MCA, is amended to read:
"75-5-702. Monitoring -- water quality assessment listing -- costs payable by department --
statewide advisory group. (1) The department shall monitor state waters to assess the quality of those waters
and to identify surface water bodies or segments of surface water bodies that are threatened or impaired. The
department shall use the monitoring results to revise the list of water bodies that are identified as threatened or
impaired and to establish a priority ranking for TMDL development for those waters in accordance with
subsections (4) and (7).
(2) In revising the list prepared pursuant to this section, the department shall use all currently
available data, including information or data obtained from federal, state, and local agencies, private entities, or
individuals with an interest in water quality protection. Except as provided in subsection (6), the department
may modify the list only if there is sufficient credible data to support the modification. Prior to publishing a final
list, the department shall provide public notice and allow 60 days for public comment on the draft list. The
department shall make available for public review, upon request, documentation used in the determination to
list or delist a particular water body, including, at a minimum, a description of the information, data, and
methodology used. The department may charge a reasonable fee for the documentation, commensurate with
the cost of providing the documentation to the requestor.
(3) A person may request that the department add or remove a water body or reprioritize a water
body on a draft or published list by providing the data or information necessary to support the request. The
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 684
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 684
department shall review the data within 60 days from its submittal. The department shall review the data within
180 days from its submittal. If the department determines that there is sufficient credible data to grant the
request, the department shall provide public notice of its intended action and allow 60 days for public comment
prior to taking action on the request. A person aggrieved by the department's decision to grant or deny the
request may appeal the department's decision to the board.
(4) The department shall, in consultation with local conservation districts and watershed advisory
groups pursuant to 75-5-704, review and revise the list and priority rankings of water bodies identified as
threatened or impaired. The department shall review and revise the list at intervals not to exceed 5 years. The
department shall make available for public review the data and information used in making any changes in its
list of threatened or impaired water bodies that is developed and maintained pursuant to this section.
(5) By October 1, 1999, and in consultation with the statewide TMDL advisory group established
pursuant to subsection (10), the department shall develop and maintain a data management system that can be
used to assess the validity and reliability of the data used in the listing and priority ranking process. The
department shall make available to the public, upon request, data from its data management system. The
department may charge a reasonable fee for the data, commensurate with its cost of providing the data to the
requestor.
(6) By October 1, 1999, and in consultation with the statewide TMDL advisory group, the
department shall use the data management system developed and maintained pursuant to subsection (5) to
revise the list and to remove any water body that lacks sufficient credible data to support its listing. If the
department removes a water body because there is a lack of sufficient credible data to support its listing, the
department shall monitor and assess that water body during the next field season or as soon as possible
thereafter to determine whether it is a threatened water body or an impaired water body.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (9), in prioritizing water bodies for TMDL development, the
department shall, in consultation with the statewide TMDL advisory group, take into consideration the following:
(a) the beneficial uses established for a water body;
(b) the extent that natural factors over which humans have no control are contributing to any
impairment;
(c) the impacts to human health and aquatic life;
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 684
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 684
(d) the degree of public interest and support;
(e) the character of the pollutant and the severity and magnitude of water quality standard
noncompliance;
(f) whether the water body is an important high-quality resource in an early stage of degradation;
(g) the size of the water body not achieving standards;
(h) immediate programmatic needs, such as waste load allocations for new permits or permit
renewals and load allocations for new nonpoint sources;
(i) court orders and decisions relating to water quality;
(j) state policies and priorities, including the protection and restoration of native fish when
appropriate;
(k) the availability of technology and resources to correct the problems;
(l) whether actions or voluntary programs that are likely to correct the impairment of a particular
water body are currently in place; and
(m) the recreational, economic, and aesthetic importance of a particular water body.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (9), the department shall, in consultation with the statewide
TMDL advisory group, develop a method of rating water bodies according to the criteria and considerations
described in subsection (7) in order to rank the listed water bodies as high priority, moderate priority, or low
priority for TMDL development. The department may not rank a water body as a high priority under this section
without first validating the data necessary to support the ranking.
(9) (a) When the department receives an application for a new individual permit to discharge into a
surface water body or a segment of a surface water body pursuant to 75-5-401, the surface water body or
segment of a surface water body has been listed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the discharge would
contain a pollutant for which the water body or segment is threatened or impaired, and a TMDL has not been
developed for that water body or segment, the department shall:
(i) within 30 days of the department's receipt of the application, initiate the development of a
TMDL on the water body or segment; and
(ii) except as provided in subsection (9)(b), within 180 days of the department's receipt of the
application, complete development of the TMDL pursuant to 75-5-703.
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 684
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 684
(b) If the department is not able to complete development of the TMDL in accordance with
subsection (9)(a)(ii), the department shall, within 30 days of the department's receipt of the application, specify
in writing to the applicant why the department is not able to complete development of a TMDL in accordance
with subsection (9)(a)(ii). The department and the applicant shall make reasonable efforts to mutually agree in
writing to a timeframe in which the department shall complete development of the TMDL. If the department
specifies a lack of resources as a reason why the department cannot complete development of the TMDL in
accordance with subsection (9)(a)(ii), the department shall clearly explain in its written specification what
resources are not available, why those resources are not available, and when those resources will be available.
(c) If the department and the applicant cannot mutually agree to a timeframe in accordance with
subsection (9)(b), the department shall, within 60 days of the department's receipt of the application, specify in
writing to the applicant the timeframe in which the TMDL will be completed by the department and the reasons
why that timeframe is appropriate. If the department specifies a lack of resources as a reason why the
department's timeframe is appropriate, the department may request the applicant provide funding for the
development of the TMDL in order to accelerate the completion of the TMDL.
(d) The applicant may, within 15 days of the department's written specification provided in
accordance with subsection (9)(c), request in writing a hearing before the board for the purpose of petitioning
the board to reverse or modify the department's decision. The contested case provisions of the Montana
Administrative Procedure Act, Title 2, chapter 4, part 6, apply to a hearing before the board under this
subsection. If the parties to the contested case waive a formal proceeding pursuant to 2-4-603, the informal
proceeding must be conducted within 30 days after the board's receipt of the written request. After the hearing
and in a reasonable time, the board shall affirm, modify, or reverse the action of the department, and the board
shall make findings and conclusions that explain its decision. Pending the board's decision, the department
shall develop the TMDL in accordance with the timeframe specified in subsection (9)(a)(ii).
(e) The department may not declare an application incomplete or deficient because a TMDL has
not been prepared.
(f) If on April 27, 2015, an application for a new individual permit to discharge into a surface water
body or a segment of a surface water body pursuant to 75-5-401 is pending, the surface water body or segment
of a surface water body has been listed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the discharge would contain
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 684
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 684
a pollutant for which the water body or segment is threatened or impaired, and a TMDL has not been developed
for the water body or segment, the department shall, except as provided in subsection (9)(g), complete a TMDL
for the water body or segment within 180 days of April 27, 2015.
(g) If the department is not able to complete development of the TMDL within 180 days of April 27,
2015, pursuant to subsection (9)(f), then the timeframes established in accordance with subsections (9)(b),
(9)(c), and (9)(d) apply to the application, but the timeframes are measured from April 27, 2015, not from the
date the department receives an application.
(10) (a) The department shall establish a statewide TMDL advisory group to serve in the
consultation capacity set forth in 75-5-703, 75-5-704, and this section. Fourteen members, and any
replacement members that may be necessary, must be appointed by the director, based upon one nomination
from each of the following interests:
(i) livestock-oriented agriculture;
(ii) farming-oriented agriculture;
(iii) conservation or environmental interests;
(iv) water-based recreationists;
(v) the forestry industry;
(vi) municipalities;
(vii) point source dischargers;
(viii) mining;
(ix) federal land management agencies;
(x) state trust land management agencies;
(xi) supervisors of soil and water conservation districts for counties east of the continental divide;
(xii) supervisors of soil and water conservation districts for counties west of the continental divide;
(xiii) the hydroelectric industry; and
(xiv) fishing-related businesses.
(b) If the director receives more than one nomination from a particular interest, the director shall
notify the respective nominators and request that they agree on one nominee.
(11) The department shall provide public notice of meetings of the statewide TMDL advisory group
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 684
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 684
and shall solicit, document, and consider public comments provided during the deliberations of the advisory
group."
- END -
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 684
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 684, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 684
INTRODUCED BY S. FITZPATRICK
AN ACT ELIMINATING REVISING THE DEADLINE FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY
TO REVIEW DATA FOR WATER QUALITY ASSESSMENTS; AND AMENDING SECTION 75-5-702, MCA.”